fr: Outil de tir à l’arc compatible: Scie à flèche; Presse pour arc; Peson pour arc; Empenneuse; Pince à nock set; Outil pour visette; Bobineur pour tranche-fil; Métier à corde; Gabarit pour corde; Jauge de réglage; Autre
hr-HR: Kompatibilni alat za streličarstvo: Pila za strijele; Preša za luk; Vaga za luk; Alat za postavljanje perca; Kliješta za nock; Alat za peep sight; Alat za namotavanje tetive; Alat za izradu tetiva; Okvir za tetive; Mjerač za ugađanje; Ostalo
da: Kompatibelt bueskydningsværktøj: Pilesav; Buepresse; Buevægt; Faneapparat; Nokketang; Værktøj til peepsight; Beviklingsapparat; Værktøj til buestrenge; Streng-jig; Tuningmåler; Andet
cs: Kompatibilní lukostřelecká pomůcka: Pila na šípy; Lis na luky; Váha na luk; Lepička křidélek; Kleště na nocky; Nástroj na průhledítko; Omotávačka na tětivu; Stojan na výrobu tětivy; Přípravek na tětivu; Ladicí měrka; Ostatní
el: Συμβατό εργαλείο τοξοβολίας: Πριόνι για βέλη; Πρέσα τόξου; Ζυγαριά τόξου; Οδηγός τοποθέτησης φτερών; Πένσα για nock; Εργαλείο για peep sight; Εργαλείο περιέλιξης χορδής; Οδηγός κατασκευής χορδής; Οδηγός χορδής; Μετρητής ρύθμισης; Άλλο
pl: Kompatybilne narzędzie łucznicze: Piła do strzał; Prasa do łuku; Waga do łuku; Maszynka do klejenia lotek; Szczypce do zaciskania siodełka; Narzędzie do peep sightu; Nawijarka do owijki; Stanowisko do robienia cięciw; Rama do cięciw; Przymiar łuczniczy; Inne
hu: Kompatibilis íjászeszköz: Vesszővágó fűrész; Íjprés; Íjmérleg; Tollazó készülék; Göbnyomó fogó; Peep irányzék beállító; Bandázsoló; Idegkészítő állvány; Idegkészítő pad; Hangolásmérő; Egyéb
vi: Dụng cụ bắn cung tương thích: Cưa mũi tên; Máy ép cung; Cân đo lực kéo cung; Đồ gá dán lông tên; Kìm kẹp điểm nock; Dụng cụ gắn kính ngắm peep; Dụng cụ cuốn dây cung; Đồ gá bện dây cung; Đồ gá dây cung; Thước đo tinh chỉnh; Khác
nl: Compatibel boogschietgereedschap: Pijlenzaag; Boogpers; Boogunster; Verenplakker; Noktang; Peep sight-gereedschap; Peeswikkelaar; Peesbouwmal; Peesmal; Afstelmeter; Overige
ja: 互換性のあるアーチェリー用具: アローソー; ボウプレス; ボウスケール; フレッチングジグ; ノッキングプライヤー; ピープサイトツール; サービングジグ; ストリングビルディングジグ; ストリングジグ; チューニングゲージ; その他
fi: Yhteensopiva jousiammuntatyökalu: Nuolisaha; Jousipuristin; Jousivaaka; Sulitusjigi; Nokkipihdit; Takatähtäimen työkalu; Punoslaite; Jänteenrakennusjigi; Jännejigi; Viritysmitta; Muu
pt-PT: Ferramenta de tiro com arco compatível: Serra para setas; Prensa para arcos; Balança para arcos; Gabarito de emplumação; Alicate para nocking; Ferramenta para peep sight; Enrolador de corda; Gabarito de construção de corda; Gabarito de corda; Medidor de afinação; Outro
sl-SI: Združljivo orodje za lokostrelstvo: Žaga za puščice; Stiskalnica za loke; Tehtnica za lok; Priprava za lepljenje peres; Klešče za nocke; Orodje za merek; Priprava za povijanje; Priprava za izdelavo tetive; Priprava za tetivo; Merilnik za uglaševanje loka; Drugo
zh-CN: 适配的射箭工具: 截箭锯; 压弓器; 弓秤; 粘羽器; 搭箭点专用钳; 窥孔工具; 护弦线缠线器; 弓弦制作架; 弓弦架; 调弓尺; 其他
lt-LT: Suderinamas šaudymo iš lanko įrankis: Strėlių pjūklas; Lanko presas; Lanko svarstyklės; Plunksnų klijavimo įrankis; Fiksatorių replės; Taikiklio įrankis; Tempties vyniotuvas; Tempties gamybos staklės; Tempties staklės; Derinimo matuoklis; Kita
sk-SK: Kompatibilný lukostrelecký nástroj: Píla na šípy; Lis na luky; Váha na luky; Lepiaca pomôcka na letky; Kliešte na lôžka šípov; Nástroj na peep sight; Omotávač tetivy; Stojan na výrobu tetivy; Nástroj na tetivy; Mierka na ladenie; Iné
ru: Совместимый инструмент для стрельбы из лука: Пила для стрел; Пресс для лука; Весы для лука; Пероклейка; Плоскогубцы для установки седла тетивы; Инструмент для пип-сайта; Машинка для обмотки тетивы; Станок для изготовления тетивы; Станок для тетивы; Линейка для настройки; Другое
ro-RO: Instrument de tir cu arcul compatibil: Ferăstrău pentru săgeți; Presă pentru arc; Cântar pentru arc; Dispozitiv pentru pene; Clește pentru nock; Unealtă pentru vizor (peep sight); Dispozitiv de matisare; Dispozitiv pentru fabricat corzi; Dispozitiv pentru coardă; Instrument de măsurare pentru reglaj; Altele
es: Herramienta de tiro con arco compatible: Sierra para flechas; Prensa para arco; Báscula para arco; Emplumadora; Alicates para nock; Herramienta para peep sight; Devanadora; Plantilla para fabricar cuerdas; Plantilla para cuerdas; Calibre de ajuste; Otro
it: Attrezzo da tiro con l'arco compatibile: Tagliafrecce; Pressa per arco; Bilancia per arco; Impennatore; Pinza per incocco; Strumento per visette; Avvolgifilo; Telaio per corde; Telaio per corde; Squadretta per arco; Altro
zh-TW: 相容射箭工具: 箭鋸; 壓弓架; 測力計; 黏羽架; 搭箭點鉗; 窺孔工具; 護弦線纏線器; 弓弦編織架; 弓弦架; 調弓尺; 其他
th: อุปกรณ์ยิงธนูที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: เลื่อยตัดลูกธนู; แท่นอัดคันธนู; ตาชั่งวัดน้ำหนักดึง; จิ๊กติดหางธนู; คีมติดศูนย์ร่องสาย; เครื่องมือศูนย์เล็ง; เครื่องพันสายธนู; จิ๊กทำสายธนู; จิ๊กสายธนู; เกจปรับตั้ง; อื่นๆ
sv: Kompatibelt bågskytteverktyg: Pilsåg; Bågpress; Bågvåg; Fjäderjigg; Nocktång; Peep sight-verktyg; Lindningsjigg; Strängjigg; Strängjigg; Justeringsmätare; Övrigt
de: Kompatibles Bogenschießgerät: Pfeilsäge; Bogenpresse; Bogenwaage; Befiederungsgerät; Nockpunktzange; Peep-Sight-Werkzeug; Wickelgerät; Sehnenbau-Galgen; Sehnengalgen; Tuning-Lehre; Sonstige
bg-BG: Съвместим инструмент за стрелба с лък: Трион за стрели; Преса за лък; Кантар за лък; Инструмент за оперение (fletching jig); Клещи за поставяне на гнезда; Инструмент за пипсайт (peep sight); Инструмент за сервиране (serving jig); Стенд за изработка на тетиви; Стенд за тетиви; Уред за настройка; Друго
tr: Uyumlu okçuluk aleti: Ok testeresi; Yay presi; Yay tartısı; Tüyleme aparatı; Kiriş pensesi; Gez aparatı; Kiriş sarma aparatı; Kiriş yapma aparatı; Kiriş aparatı; Ayar mastarı; Diğer
nb: Kompatibelt bueskyteverktøy: Pilsag; Buepresse; Buevekt; Fjæringsjigg; Nokktang; Verktøy for peepsikte; Surrejigg; Strengemakerjigg; Strengjigg; Trimmingsmåler; Annet
en: Compatible archery tool: Arrow saw; Bow press; Bow scale; Fletching jig; Nocking pliers; Peep sight tool; Serving jig; String building jig; String jig; Tuning gauge; Other
pt-BR: Ferramenta de arco e flecha compatível: Serra para flecha; Prensa para arco; Balança para arco; Gabarito para emplumação; Alicate para nock; Ferramenta para peep sight; Gabarito para serving; Gabarito para fabricação de corda; Gabarito para corda; Medidor de afinação; Outro
ko: 호환되는 양궁 도구: 화살 톱; 보우 프레스; 활 저울; 플레칭 지그; 노킹 플라이어; 핍 사이트 도구; 서빙 지그; 스트링 빌딩 지그; 스트링 지그; 튜닝 게이지; 기타